North Carolina, session 2025, SB1051.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 110 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 7A.
"Protection of Family Child Care Home Operations.
"§ 110-107.25. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Family child care home. – The same meaning as set forth in G.S. 110-86(3)b.,
limited to facilities licensed under G.S. 110-88.
(2) HOA governing document. – Any declaration, covenant, condition,
restriction, bylaw, rule, or regulation of a homeowners association,
condominium association, planned community, or similar entity that governs
the use of residential property.
(3) Landlord. – The same meaning as set forth in G.S. 42-40(3).
(4) Licensed operator – Any person holding a valid license to operate a family
child care home issued by the Secretary pursuant to G.S. 110-88, whether the
person is a homeowner or a tenant residing at the licensed premises.
"§ 110-107.26. HOA restrictions prohibited.
*S1051-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) Any provision of an HOA governing document that prohibits, restricts, conditions, or
penalizes the operation of a licensed family child care home by a member or resident who holds
a valid license issued pursuant to G.S. 110-88 is void and unenforceable as contrary to the public
policy of this State.
(b) A homeowners association or condominium association shall not do any of the
following:
(1) Deny, suspend, revoke, or condition membership rights or community
privileges solely on account of a member's operation of a licensed family child
care home.
(2) Impose fees, assessments, fines, or penalties on a member solely on account
of the member's operation of a licensed family child care home.
(3) Require approval or consent of the association as a condition of operating a
licensed family child care home.
(c) Nothing in this section prohibits an association from enforcing rules of general
applicability relating to parking, noise, exterior modifications, or use of common areas to the
extent such rules do not impose requirements more burdensome on licensed family child care
homes than on other residential uses.
"§ 110-107.27. Landlord restrictions prohibited.
(a) A landlord shall not include in any lease, rental agreement, or tenancy arrangement a
provision that prohibits, restricts, or penalizes a tenant from operating a licensed family child
care home at the leased premises.
(b) Any lease provision in violation of subsection (a) of this section is void and
unenforceable as against public policy.
(c) A landlord shall not terminate a tenancy, refuse to renew a lease, or take any adverse
action against a tenant solely because the tenant operates or intends to operate a licensed family
child care home.
(d) A tenant operating a licensed family child care home remains responsible for
compliance with all other applicable lease terms, including obligations regarding maintenance of
the premises, liability, and insurance, and shall carry liability insurance in amounts sufficient to
cover the operation of the child care home.
(e) A landlord may require a tenant to do the following:
(1) Provide written notice of the intent to operate a licensed family child care
home.
(2) Provide a copy of any license issued pursuant to G.S. 110-88.
(3) Require the tenant to maintain adequate liability insurance coverage.
"§ 110-107.28. Local government zoning; limitations.
(a) For purposes of local land use and zoning regulation, a licensed family child care
home shall be deemed a residential use of property and shall be permitted as a matter of right in
any zoning district in which single-family or multi-family residential uses are permitted,
including residential zones, mixed-use zones, or any other district that allows residential
dwellings.
(b) A local government shall not adopt or enforce any zoning ordinance, development
regulation, or land use restriction that does any of the following:
(1) Subjects a licensed family child care home to requirements, conditions, or
standards more burdensome than those applicable to other single-family or
multi-family residential dwellings in the same zoning district.
(2) Imposes special use permit requirements, conditional use permit
requirements, or other discretionary approval processes applicable to licensed
family child care homes but not to other residential uses.
(3) Limits the number of licensed family child care homes permitted within a
zoning district based solely on the child care use.
Page 2 Senate Bill 1051-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) Requires a licensed family child care home to comply with commercial or
institutional zoning standards, including but not limited to commercial
parking minimums, commercial signage requirements, or non-residential
setback requirements.
(c) A local government may impose on a licensed family child care home only those
development standards that would apply to the residential use of the property generally, including
applicable building codes, fire codes, and health and sanitation requirements.
(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to preempt or limit the application of
standards adopted by the Child Care Commission or the Department of Health and Human
Services governing the health, safety, and physical environment of licensed child care facilities.
"§ 110-107.29. Remedies.
(a) Any licensed operator whose rights under this Article are violated may bring a civil
action in superior court for any of the following:
(1) Declaratory and injunctive relief.
(2) Actual damages.
(3) Reasonable attorney's fees and costs if the licensed operator is the prevailing
party.
(b) The Attorney General may bring an action on behalf of the State to enforce the
provisions of this Article.
"§ 110-107.30. Application.
This Article applies to all HOA governing documents, lease agreements, and local zoning
ordinances adopted before, on, or after the effective date of this act. Any provision of a governing
document, lease, or ordinance that conflicts with this Article is void and unenforceable to the
extent of the conflict."
SECTION 2. Article 3 of Chapter 47F is amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 47F-3-123. Operation of a licensed family child care home.
A homeowners association shall not prohibit, restrict, or penalize the operation of a licensed
family child care home, as defined in G.S. 110-86(3)b., by a lot owner or tenant who holds a
valid license issued pursuant to G.S. 110-88. Any provision of a declaration, covenant, bylaw, or
rule of the association to the contrary is void and unenforceable. This subsection shall not be
construed to prevent the association from enforcing rules of general applicability as provided in
G.S. 110-107.26(c)."
SECTION 3. Nothing in this act is intended to abrogate reasonable health, safety,
building code, or fire code requirements applicable to child care facilities.
SECTION 4.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education (Division), the
sum of seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year to be used as follows:
(1) Develop and disseminate plain-language guidance for licensed family child
care home operators regarding their rights under Article 7A of Chapter 110 of
the General Statutes, as enacted by Section 1 of this act.
(2) Create model response templates and informational materials for use by
licensed operators in disputes with homeowners associations, landlords, and
local governments.
(3) Update the Department of Health and Human Services' public website,
licensing portal, and printed materials to inform current and prospective
licensees of the protections established by this act.
SECTION 4.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Justice, Office of the Attorney General, the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to do each of the following:
Senate Bill 1051-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Train attorneys and staff within the Consumer Protection Division or other
appropriate division on the enforcement provisions of Article 7A of Chapter
110 of the General Statutes, as enacted by Section 1 of this act.
(2) Establish a complaint intake process for licensed family child care home
operators alleging violations of G.S. 110-107.26, G.S. 110-107.27, or
G.S. 110-107.28, as enacted by Section 1 of this act.
(3) Prepare and publish an annual summary of complaints received and
enforcement actions taken under this act, to be submitted to the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services no later than
October 1 of each year.
SECTION 5. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to all acts,
ordinances, and agreements entered into on or after that date. For HOA governing documents
and lease agreements existing before the effective date of this act, provisions contrary to this act
are void and unenforceable as of the effective date.
Page 4 Senate Bill 1051-First Edition